Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Creation and Organization.

Sec. 44.83.010.
Legislative finding and policy. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.020.
Creation of authority.

There is created the Alaska Energy Authority. The authority is a public corporation of the state in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development but with separate and independent legal existence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 75 § 2 (1989))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.020. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.83.030.
Membership of the authority.

The directors of the Alaska Energy Authority are the members of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 25 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.030. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.83.040.
Officers; meetings; quorum.

The chair and vice-chair of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority shall serve as officers of the Alaska Energy Authority. The powers of the Alaska Energy Authority are vested in the directors, and four directors of the authority constitute a quorum. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the Alaska Energy Authority at a meeting by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors. The directors of the Alaska Energy Authority serve without compensation, but they shall receive the same travel pay and per diem as provided by law for board members under AS

39.20.180

.

The board may meet and transact business by an electronic medium if

public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by an electronic medium has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location;

participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and

copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public.

A meeting by an electronic medium as provided in this section has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

A director of the authority may not vote on a resolution of the authority relating to a lease or contract to be entered into by the authority under this chapter if the director is a party to the lease or contract or has a direct ownership or equity interest in a firm, partnership, corporation, or association that is a party to the contract or lease. When abstaining from voting, the director must disclose the reason for the abstention. A director who is a member of an electric cooperative that is organized under or subject to AS 10.25 (Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act) may vote on a resolution relating to a contract or lease to which that cooperative is a party. The director shall disclose the cooperative membership at the time of voting. A resolution of the authority that is approved by a majority of the directors present who are not barred from voting under this subsection is a valid action of the authority for all purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 118 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 8 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 6 FSSLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.040. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 14, 2011, substituted “four directors” for “three directors” in the second sentence in (a).

Sec. 44.83.045.
Qualifications, powers, and duties of officers and directors. [Repealed, § 27 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.050.
Staff. [Repealed, § 23 ch 156 SLA 1978.]